Maine, session 132, LD75.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §341-G, first ¶, as amended by PL 2003, c. 245, §2, is further
amended to read:
There is established the The Board of Environmental Protection Fund is established to
be used by the board as a nonlapsing fund to carry out its duties under this Title.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds identified in
subsection 1 transfer annually to the Board of Environmental Protection Fund in an amount
not to exceed $325,000 $450,000. Money in the Board of Environmental Protection Fund
may only be expended in accordance with allocations approved by the Legislature.